New Jersey, session 221, A5856.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.         Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et seq.) and P.L.2018, c.67 (C.18A:7F-67 et al.) or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a school district shall be eligible for additional State aid equal to the sum of any reductions in State school aid greater than three percent of the prior years State school aid experienced in any of the 2020-2021 through the 2024-2025 school years. b.    As used in this section, State school aid means the sum of a districts equalization aid, transportation aid, special education categorical aid, security categorical aid, and adjustment aid as distributed pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2018, c.67 (C.18A:7F-67 et al.). 2.    There is appropriated from the Property Tax Relief Fund to the Department of Education such amounts as are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.